Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.040

Procedures—Ballot form and arrangement.

(1) Except where necessary to accommodate the national or state rules of a major political party or where this chapter specifically provides otherwise, the presidential primary must be conducted in substantially the same manner as a state primary under this title.

(2) The arrangement and form of presidential primary ballots must be established by administrative rule adopted under RCW 29A.04.620, and in consultation with the major political parties. Only the candidates who have been submitted under RCW 29A.56.031 may appear on the ballots.

(3) Each party's ballot or portion of the ballot must list alphabetically the names of all candidates for the office of president for that party. The ballot must clearly indicate the political party of each candidate.

(4) If requested by a party chair, the ballot for that party must contain a place for a voter to indicate a preference for having delegates to the party's national convention remain uncommitted. A request under this subsection must be submitted to the secretary of state no later than sixty-three days before the presidential primary.

(5) A presidential primary ballot with votes for more than one candidate is void, and notice to this effect, stated in clear, simple language and printed in large type, must appear on the face of each presidential primary ballot or on or about each voting device.

(6) Notice must be published in the manner required by RCW 29A.52.355.

[ 2019 c 7 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 54; 2007 c 385 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 1404. Prior: 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.19.045.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 20: See note following RCW 29A.56.020.